stems/stems-gan.lexc
LEXICON PronDial
вә:вә        PrnPersSg1 ;
вәму:вәму    PrnPersPl1 ;
таму:таму    PrnPersPl3 ;

LEXICON PrnPersSg1
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<sg%>:  PrnPossSlot ;

LEXICON PrnPersPl1
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<pl%>:  PrnPossSlot ;

LEXICON PrnPersPl3
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<pl%>:  PrnPossSlot ;

LEXICON CopulaDial
сы:сы        Cop ;

LEXICON VerbDial
ви:ви        V ;

LEXICON ClsDial
гә:гә        Cls ;
